Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
SCOPE AND JURISDICTION

5-1-201. Territorial application - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this code applies to consumer credit transactions made in this state and to modifications, including refinancing, consolidations, and deferrals, made in this state, of consumer credit transactions, wherever made. For purposes of this code, a consumer credit transaction is made in this state if:

A written agreement evidencing the obligation or offer of the consumer is received by the creditor in this state; or

A consumer who is a resident of this state enters into the transaction with a creditor who has solicited or advertised in this state by any means, including but not limited to mail, brochure, telephone, print, radio, television, internet, or any other electronic means.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, unless made subject to this code by agreement of the parties, a consumer credit transaction is not made in this state if a resident of this state enters into the transaction while physically present in another state.

Part 1 of article 5 of this title and sections 5-3-104 and 5-3-105 apply to actions or other proceedings brought in this state to enforce rights arising out of a consumer credit transaction, or modification thereof, wherever made.

If a consumer credit transaction, or modification thereof, is made in another state with a person who is a resident of this state when the consumer credit transaction or modification is made, the following provisions apply as though the transaction occurred in this state:

A creditor, or assignee of the creditor's rights, may not collect charges through actions or other proceedings in excess of those permitted by this code; and

A creditor, or assignee of the creditor's rights, may not enforce rights against the consumer that violate the provisions of this code on limitations on agreements and practices.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a consumer credit transaction, or modification thereof, made in another state with a person who was not a resident of this state when the consumer credit transaction or modification was made is valid and enforceable in this state according to its terms to the extent that it is valid and enforceable under the laws of the state applicable to the transaction.

For the purposes of this code, the "residence" of a consumer is the address given by the consumer as the consumer's residence in any writing provided by the consumer in connection with a credit transaction. Until the consumer notifies the creditor of a new or different address, the given address is presumed to be unchanged.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section:

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, this code does not apply if the consumer is not a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of the consumer's residence applies; and

This code applies if the consumer is a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of this state applies.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, an agreement by a consumer is invalid with respect to consumer credit transactions, or modifications thereof, to which this code applies when such agreement provides that:

The law of another state shall apply;

The consumer consents to the jurisdiction of another state; or

Venue is fixed.

The following provisions of this code specify the applicable law governing certain cases:

Section 5-6-102 on the powers and functions of the administrator; and

Section 5-6-201 on notification and fees.

For the purpose of subsection (1) of this section, "receive" means obtained as a result of physical delivery, transmission, or communication to one who has actual or apparent authority to act for the creditor in this state whether or not approval, acceptance, or ratification by any other agent or representative of such creditor in some other state is necessary to give legal consequence to the consumer credit transaction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, this code applies to any consumer insurance premium loan made to a resident of this state.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1180, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-201, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-1-202. Exclusions.

This code does not apply to:

Extensions of credit to government or governmental agencies or instrumentalities;

Except as otherwise provided in article 4 of this title, the sale of insurance if there is no legal obligation to pay installments of the premium and the insurance may terminate or be canceled after nonpayment of an installment of the premium;

Transactions under public utility or common carrier tariffs if a subdivision or agency of this state or of the United States regulates the charges for the services involved, the charges for delayed payment, and any discount allowed for early payment;

With respect to contracts for purchase entered into by a pawnbroker, as the terms are defined in section 29-11.9-101, the rates and charges, and the disclosure of rates and charges, if the rates and charges do not exceed the fixed price permitted by section 29-11.9-101 (2). The exclusion in this subsection (1)(d)(I) applies to pawnbrokers who are:

Licensed by a local licensing authority pursuant to section 29-11.9-102; or

Regulated, with respect to rates and charges, by a local governing authority pursuant to section 29-11.9-102.

The exclusion in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) also applies to pawnbrokers authorized to make supervised loans under section 5-2-301 with respect to contracts for purchase; except that the exclusion does not apply to the disclosure of rates and charges of pawnbrokers authorized to make supervised loans.

The disclosure of rates and charges in connection with transactions in securities and commodities accounts by a broker-dealer registered with the securities and exchange commission;

Loans made, originated, disbursed, serviced, or guaranteed by an agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state pursuant to article 3.1 of title 23, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1182, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 12-1328), ch. 218, p. 936, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(1)(d)(I) amended, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1041, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-202, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For regulation of insurance agents, brokers, and representatives, see article 2 of title 10; for regulation of pawnbrokers, see article 11.9 of title 29; for regulation of securities brokers, see article 51 of title 11; for credit unions, see article 30 of title 11.

5-1-203. Jurisdiction and service of process.

The court of record of any judicial district in this state may exercise jurisdiction over any creditor with respect to any conduct in this state governed by this code or with respect to any claim arising from a transaction subject to this code. In addition to any other method provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure or by statute, personal jurisdiction over a creditor may be acquired in a civil action or proceeding instituted in the court of record by the service of process in the manner provided by this section.

If a creditor is not a resident of this state or is a corporation not authorized to do business in this state and engages in any conduct in this state governed by this code or engages in a transaction subject to this code, the creditor may designate an agent upon whom service of process may be made in this state. The agent shall be a resident of this state or a corporation authorized to do business in this state. The designation shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of state. If no designation is made and filed or if process cannot be served in this state upon the designated agent, process may be served upon the secretary of state, but service upon the secretary of state is not effective unless the plaintiff or petitioner forthwith mails a copy of the process and pleading by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his or her last reasonably ascertainable address. An affidavit of compliance with this section shall be filed with the clerk of the court on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within any further time the court allows.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1183, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-203, as it existed prior to 2000.